Maryland, session 2025, SB0637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
16–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) (1) “Nonwater–dependent project” means a temporary or permanent
structure that, by reason of its intrinsic nature, use, or operation, does not require location
in, on, or over State or private wetlands.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0637*

SENATE BILL 637
(2) “Nonwater–dependent project” includes:
(i) A dwelling unit on a pier;
(ii) A restaurant, a shop, an office, or any other commercial building
or use on a pier;
(iii) A temporary or permanent roof or covering on a pier;
(iv) A pier used to support a nonwater–dependent use; and
(v) A small–scale renewable energy system on a pier, including:
1. A solar energy system and its photovoltaic cells, solar
panels, or other necessary equipment;
2. A geothermal energy system and its geothermal heat
exchanger or other necessary equipment; and
3. A wind energy system and its wind turbine, tower, base,
or other necessary equipment.
(3) “Nonwater–dependent project” does not include:
(i) A fuel pump or other fuel–dispensing equipment on a pier;
(ii) A sanitary sewage pump or other wastewater removal equipment
on a pier;
(iii) A pump, a pipe, or any other equipment attached to a pier and
associated with a shellfish nursery operation under a permit issued by the Department of
Natural Resources under § 4–11A–23 of the Natural Resources Article; [or]
(iv) An office on a pier for managing marina operations, including
monitoring vessel traffic, registering vessels, providing docking services, and housing
electrical or emergency equipment related to marina operations; OR
(V) A VESSEL REGISTERED UNDER TITLE 8, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE
NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE, REGARDLESS OF HOW THE VESSEL IS USED OR
OPERATED.
16–104.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection and
notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board of Public Works may not issue a
license to authorize a nonwater–dependent project located on State wetlands.

SENATE BILL 637 3
(2) The Board of Public Works may issue a license to authorize a
nonwater–dependent project located on State wetlands if the project:
(i) 1. Involves a commercial activity that is permitted as a
secondary or accessory use to a permitted primary commercial use;
2. Is not located on a pier that is attached to residentially,
institutionally, or industrially used property;
3. Avoids and minimizes impacts to State or private
wetlands and other aquatic resources;
4. Is located in:
A. An intensely developed area and the project is authorized
under a program amendment to a local jurisdiction’s critical area program approved on or
after July 1, 2013, if the approved program amendment includes necessary changes to the
local jurisdiction’s zoning, subdivision, and other ordinances so as to be consistent with or
more restrictive than the requirements provided under this paragraph; or
B. An area that has been excluded from a local critical area
program if the exclusion has been adopted or approved by the Critical Area Commission for
the Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal Bays;
5. Is approved by the local planning and zoning authorities
after the local jurisdiction’s program amendment under item 4A of this item, if applicable,
has been approved;
6. Allows or enhances public access to State wetlands;
7. Does not expand beyond the length, width, or channelward
encroachment of the pier on which the project is constructed;
8. Has a height of up to 18 feet unless the project is located
at a marina and the Secretary recommends additional height;
9. Is up to 1,000 square feet in total area;
10. Is not located in, on, or over vegetated tidal wetlands,
submerged aquatic vegetation, a natural oyster bar, a public shellfish fishery area, a Yates
Bar, or an area with rare, threatened, or endangered species or species in need of
conservation; and
11. Does not adversely impact a fish spawning or nursery area
or an historic waterfowl staging area; or

SENATE BILL 637
(ii) 1. Is located on a pier that was in existence on or before
December 31, 2012;
2. Satisfies all of the requirements under item (i)1 through 8
of this paragraph; and
3. If applicable, has a temporary or permanent roof or
covering that is up to 1,000 square feet in total area.
(3) (i) The Board of Public Works may issue a license to authorize a
nonwater–dependent project for a small–scale renewable energy system on a pier located
on State wetlands if the project:
1. Involves the installation or placement of a small–scale
renewable energy system that is permitted as a secondary or accessory use on a pier that
is authorized under this title;
2. Avoids and minimizes impacts to State or private
wetlands and other aquatic resources;
3. Is located in:
A. The Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal Bays Critical Area
and the project is authorized under a program amendment to a local jurisdiction’s critical
area program approved on or after July 1, 2013, if the approved program amendment
includes necessary changes to the local jurisdiction’s zoning, subdivision, and other
ordinances so as to be consistent with or more restrictive than the requirements provided
under this paragraph; or
B. An area that has been excluded from a local critical area
program if the exclusion has been adopted or approved by the Critical Area Commission for
the Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal Bays;
4. Is approved by the local planning and zoning authorities
after the local jurisdiction’s program amendment under item 3A of this subparagraph, if
applicable, has been approved;
5. Is not located in, on, or over vegetated tidal wetlands,
submerged aquatic vegetation, a natural oyster bar, a public shellfish fishery area, a Yates
Bar, or an area with rare, threatened, or endangered species or species in need of
conservation; and
6. Does not adversely impact a fish spawning or nursery area
or an historic waterfowl staging area.
(ii) A license issued under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may
include the installation or placement of:

SENATE BILL 637 5
1. A solar energy system attached to a pier if the device or
equipment associated with that system does not extend more than:
A. 4 feet above or 18 inches below the deck of the pier; or
B. 1 foot beyond the length or width of the pier;
2. A solar energy system attached to a piling if there is only
one solar panel per boat slip;
3. A solar energy system attached to a boathouse roof if the
device or equipment associated with that system does not extend beyond the length, width,
or height of the boathouse roof;
4. A closed–loop geothermal heat exchanger under a pier if
the geothermal heat exchanger or any associated devices or equipment do not:
A. Extend beyond the length, width, or channelward
encroachment of the pier;
B. Deleteriously alter long shore drift; or
C. Cause significant individual or cumulative thermal
impacts to aquatic resources; or
5. A wind energy system attached to a pier if there is only
one wind energy system per pier for which:
A. The height from the deck of the pier to the blade extended
at its highest point is up to 12 feet;
B. The rotor diameter of the wind turbine is up to 4 feet; and
C. The setbacks of the wind energy system from the nearest
property line and from the channelward edge of the pier to which that system is attached
are at least 1.5 times the total height of the system from its base to the blade extended at
its highest point.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection and
notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Secretary may not issue a permit to
authorize a nonwater–dependent project located on private wetlands.
(2) Except for the public access requirement under subsection (b)(2)(i)6 of
this section, the Secretary may issue a permit to authorize a nonwater–dependent project
located on private wetlands if the project satisfies all of the requirements under subsection
(b)(2) or (3) of this section.

SENATE BILL 637
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.